New Jersey, session 222, S2551.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. A law enforcement officer employed by a police department or force that makes available to the officer an epinephrine auto-injector device in accordance with section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall successfully complete an approved educational program pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2015, c.215 (C.24:6L-5) to administer an epinephrine auto-injector device for the emergency administration of epinephrine. b.   A law enforcement officer shall provide the officers employing entity with a copy of a certificate of completion of an approved educational program, pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2015, c.215 (C.24:6L-4). c.   As used in this act law enforcement officer means any person who is employed as a permanent full-time member of an enforcement agency, who is statutorily empowered to act for the detection, investigation, arrest, and conviction of persons violating the criminal laws of this State and statutorily required to successfully complete a training course approved, or certified as being substantially equivalent to a course approved, by the Police Training Commission pursuant to P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-66 et seq.). 2.   a. A police department or force employing law enforcement officers may obtain, maintain, and make available to law enforcement officers employed by the department or force epinephrine auto-injector devices which may be used by the law enforcement officers while in the performance of official duties. b.    A police department or force that makes available to its officers epinephrine auto-injector devices pursuant to subsection a. of this section may maintain the devices in its vehicles or medical supply kits, consistent with any standards, protocols, or guidelines established by the Commissioner of Health pursuant to regulation. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following the date of enactment.